Utah statutes.
63G-12-206.   Eligibility to obtain and maintain an immediate family permit.

To be eligible to obtain or maintain an immediate family permit, an undocumented individual shall:

(1)  live in Utah;

(2)  be a member of a guest worker's immediate family; and

(3)  provide relevant contact information and regularly update the relevant contact information in a manner required by rule made in accordance with Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

